Hawaii statutes.
Rule 403 Exclusion of relevant evidence on
grounds of prejudice, confusion, or waste of time. Although relevant,
evidence may be excluded if its probative value is substantially outweighed by
the danger of unfair prejudice, confusion of the issues, or misleading the
jury, or by considerations of undue delay, waste of time, or needless
presentation of cumulative evidence. [L 1980, c 164, pt of §1]

Rule 403 Commentary

This rule is identical with Fed. R. Evid. 403. It recognizes
the necessity for discretionary qualification of the general admissibility
rule, based on such factors as potential for engendering juror prejudice,
hostility, or sympathy; potential for confusion or distraction; and likelihood
of undue waste of time. See McCormick §185. "Unfair prejudice," as
the Advisory Committee's Note to Fed. R. Evid. 403 explains, "means an
undue tendency to suggest decision on an improper basis, commonly, though not
necessarily, an emotional one." In some cases assessment of potential for
prejudice will depend upon the court's view of the ability and willingness of
jurors to follow a limiting instruction, see Rule 105 supra. Necessity for a
Rule 403 "balance" can arise in a variety of contexts because of the
pervasive nature of the principle. In particular, Rules 404(b), 608(b), and
609 implicitly call for application of this principle.

Hawaii courts have addressed the issue of discretionary
exclusion of relevant evidence in the context of admissibility of gruesome or
inflammatory photographs, see State v. Apao, 59 H. 625, 586 P.2d 250 (1978). "Other
crimes" evidence, see Rule 404(b) infra, presents a classic example of the
necessity for the Rule 403 balance, as the Hawaii Supreme Court recognized in
State v. Iaukea, 56 H. 343, 349, 537 P.2d 724, 729 (1975): "The
responsibility for maintaining the delicate balance between probative value and
prejudicial effect lies largely within the discretion of the trial court."
In State v. Murphy, 59 H. 1, 575 P.2d 448 (1978), again in commenting on "other
crimes" evidence, the court stressed the trial court's responsibility of
assessing the balance between probative value and prejudicial effect and noted
that considerations germane to such a balancing process should include actual
need for the evidence, availability of other evidence on the same issues,
probative weight of the evidence, and the potential for creating prejudice and
hostility against the accused in the minds of the jurors. The court recently
noted that character evidence (see Rule 404(a) infra) must be evaluated with
reference to the Rule 403 principle, see State v. Lui, 61 H. 328, 603 P.2d 151
(1979).

Law Journals and Reviews

Henderson v. Professional Coatings Corp.: Narrowing Third-Party
Liability in Automobile Accidents. 15 UH L. Rev. 353 (1993).

Case Notes

Admission of evidence upheld. 63 H. 488, 630 P.2d 619; 4 H.
App. 175, 664 P.2d 262.

Court abused its discretion in excluding evidence of driver's
drinking before accident. 68 H. 447, 719 P.2d 387.

Court abused its discretion in admitting Honolulu Police
Department Form 81, though parts of form where defendant invoked defendant's
rights were excised; cannot be said that error harmless. 69 H. 68, 733 P.2d
690.

The admissibility of evidence even after a demonstration of
relevance is a matter of discretion; no basis to establish a rule of
admissibility based solely on the need for evidence. 70 H. 300, 769 P.2d 1098.

Videotape was veiled attempt to successfully recreate the
motorcycle accident. 70 H. 419, 773 P.2d 1120.

Trial judge did not abuse discretion in admitting evidence of
condition of abandoned child in prosecution for attempted second degree
murder. 73 H. 109, 831 P.2d 512.

Admissibility of novel scientific evidence discussed,
focusing on DNA profiling evidence. 73 H. 130, 828 P.2d 1274.

Trial court did not abuse its discretion in refusing to admit
evidence that motorcyclist did not have motorcycle license at time of
accident. 74 H. 308, 844 P.2d 670 (1993).

Defendant's statements relevant as direct evidence of a
material element of terroristic threatening; court thus had no discretion to
exclude. 75 H. 517, 865 P.2d 157 (1994).

Trial court did not err under rule 401 and this rule in
admitting evidence that indicated that plaintiff's symptoms may have been linked
to drug use and not solely to exposure to silicone. 78 H. 287, 893 P.2d 138
(1995).

Trial court did not abuse its discretion in admitting
evidence of appellant's receipt of workers' compensation benefits, where the
probative value of the evidence substantially outweighed the danger of unfair
prejudice. 79 H. 14, 897 P.2d 941 (1995).

Admission of videotaped interview proper as it enabled jury
to view whether sex assault victim's behavior was consistent with a child her
age who had experienced a recent upsetting event. 80 H. 107, 905 P.2d 613
(1995).

Probative value of witness' testimony that witness suffered
injuries in auto accident and testimony's relevance to whether the rear-end
collision caused plaintiff's injuries substantially outweighed by danger of
substantial delay, and confusing the jury. 80 H. 212, 908 P.2d 1198 (1995).

Absent any evidence to support defendant's claim that victim
bit co-defendant on leg, court properly declined to allow examination of
co-defendant's leg in jury's presence for danger of misleading the jury. 81 H.
15, 911 P.2d 735 (1996).

No prejudice to defendant by prosecution exhibiting
co-defendant to jury where ample evidence in record to otherwise support
conviction by jury. 81 H. 15, 911 P.2d 735 (1996).

No abuse of discretion by court admitting "gruesome"
photos of decedent's sexual parts, face and nude body into evidence as photos
of injuries not needlessly cumulative nor unfairly prejudicial. 81 H. 293, 916
P.2d 703 (1996).

Trial court abused discretion by excluding evidence of arson
and breach of duty under insurance policy provisions where probative value of
evidence on issue of whether insurer was warranted in denying claim outweighed
any prejudicial effect. 82 H. 120, 920 P.2d 334 (1996).

Where defendant's witness would have contradicted officers'
testimony, exclusion of witness' testimony under this rule was abuse of
discretion. 83 H. 229, 925 P.2d 797 (1996).

Where a victim recanted allegations of abuse, probative value
of prior incidents of violence between victim and defendant to show context of
relationship, where relationship was offered as possible explanation for
victim's recantation, far outweighed any prejudice. 83 H. 289, 926 P.2d 194
(1996).

Admitting knife into evidence not legally prejudicial to
defendant once sufficient foundation had been laid and knife's relevancy
established; no abuse of discretion. 83 H. 335, 926 P.2d 1258 (1996).

Abuse of discretion where court expressly qualified witness
as expert in "visibility" analysis and none of factors under this
rule appeared to be factors in exclusion of testimony regarding range of
visibility. 85 H. 336, 944 P.2d 1279 (1997).

Where court failed to view otherwise relevant videotape
before definitively ruling on its admissibility, exclusion of tape was abuse of
discretion. 85 H. 336, 944 P.2d 1279 (1997).

Where effect of allowing officer's testimony regarding
defendant's statements about defendant's prior involvement in and experience
with prostitution and that "what occurred in this case was not
prostitution" was to allow defendant to testify without waiving
defendant's right against self-incrimination, the prejudicial effect of the
statement was minimized by its overall exculpatory import and was thus properly
admitted. 88 H. 19, 960 P.2d 1227 (1998).

Where substantial evidence was presented regarding residuary
legatee's disposition to exert undue influence, probate court's error in
admitting lay opinion testimony regarding residuary legatee's character did not
substantially prejudice residuary legatee's rights and error was thus
harmless. 90 H. 443, 979 P.2d 39 (1999).

Trial court's decision to permit witness' testimony regarding
witness' meeting with debt collector as probative of witness' state of mind
involving dealings with debt collector and to rebut suggestion by purchaser
that settlement with debt collector was fabricated was not abuse of discretion;
any prejudicial effect was mitigated by court's limiting instruction advising
jury to consider testimony only for the purpose of why the meeting took place.
92 H. 482, 993 P.2d 516 (2000).

Trial court did not abuse discretion by excluding evidence
that victim had previously been incarcerated where, absent any offer of proof
as to victim's violent conduct while in prison, probative value of victim's
imprisonment was questionable and outweighed by danger of undue prejudice that
jurors might believe that victim was a bad person who "got what he
deserved". 97 H. 206, 35 P.3d 233 (2001).

Where trial court was put on advance notice that defendant
intended to invoke Fifth Amendment privilege against self-incrimination, court
abused discretion by permitting prosecution to question defendant about false
identification cards; risk of unfair prejudice occasioned by compelling
criminal defendant to invoke privilege in front of jurors was substantial and
not outweighed by probative value of prosecution's unanswered questions. 97 H.
206, 35 P.3d 233 (2001).

Trial court correctly determined that evidence of defendant's
use and sale of illegal drugs and defendant's threat to "shoot"
witness were relevant and did not abuse its discretion in determining that the
probative value of these "other bad acts" were not substantially
outweighed by the danger of unfair prejudice. 99 H. 390, 56 P.3d 692 (2002).

Trial court did not err in admitting evidence of the
twenty-four guns not used by defendant in shooting rampage and testimony of
weapons specialist where the evidence was relevant to show that defendant could
appreciate the wrongfulness of defendant's conduct based upon the complex
decision-making involved in choosing a gun from defendant's arsenal and to show
defendant's planning and carrying out of plan to kill defendant's co-workers.
100 H. 442, 60 P.3d 843 (2002).

Reference to witness as "the former insurance
commissioner for the State of Hawaii" not unduly prejudicial as there was
no evidence that this reference suggested a jury decision on an improper basis;
witness was offered as an expert witness and this reference served as the basis
for the expert nature of the witness' testimony; thus, appellate court did not
err in concluding that "there was no rule that prohibited an expert from
disclosing to the jury his or her prior service as a public officer in the
field of his or her expertise". 102 H. 189, 74 P.3d 12 (2003).

Trial court erred in excluding, as cumulative under this
rule, the playing of the 911 tape, as defendant had the right to have the jury
hear the best evidence of the complainant's demeanor--the 911 tape--and not
rely on the opinions of other witnesses as to complainant's demeanor. 106 H.
116, 102 P.3d 360 (2004).

Trial court incorrectly excluded evidence of beach park
restroom resurfacing project pursuant to this rule, as project commenced before
the subject accident and the evidence was not subject to rule 407 exclusion or
the policy considerations thereunder; evidence was probative at least as to
notice and under these circumstances, admission of the evidence would not have
been unfairly prejudicial. 115 H. 462, 168 P.3d 592 (2007).

Trial court did not err in permitting prosecution to
cross-examine defendant regarding defendant's non-statements to defendant's
mental examiners where defendant's failure to mention defendant's concerns
regarding aliens was clearly relevant to the question of whether defendant was
being truthful when defendant testified at trial about having those concerns at
the time of the incident, and §704-416 only addresses the admissibility of
defendant's statements, not non-statements; thus, as the introduction of
defendant's non-statements did not violate chapter 704, defendant's right to a
fair trial was not prejudiced by admission of the testimony. 116 H. 200, 172
P.3d 512 (2007).

Where handgun constituted a significant piece of evidence
pertaining to the state of mind requisite to the charged offense of
kidnapping-with-the-intent-to-terrorize, trial court's admission of testimony
regarding the handgun was not erroneous because the testimony's probative value
outweighed any potential prejudice. 118 H. 493, 193 P.3d 409 (2008).

Where evidence of the sexual contacts in South Dakota was
probative of defendant's opportunity to commit the charged sexual assaults in
Hawaii without being detected and (1) the strength of the evidence was
essentially the same (2) the similarities between the crimes were strong (3)
there was substantial need for the evidence as absent the evidence, the jury
would have been left with the false impression that the sexual contact started
in Hawaii (4) there was no alternative way to establish the progression of
defendant's behaviors, and (5) the evidence was not likely to rouse hostility
against defendant by the jury, evidence was properly admitted. 124 H. 90, 237
P.3d 1156 (2010).

Trial court abused discretion, in admitting videotape into
evidence without first previewing tape's contents, showing tape to jury, and in
denying new trial, where prejudicial and misleading impact of videotape's
contents on jury far outweighed its probative value. 82 H. 428 (App.), 922
P.2d 1041 (1996).

No abuse of discretion by trial court's admission of doctor's
testimony regarding plaintiff's alcohol consumption where probative value of
testimony not substantially outweighed by danger of unfair prejudice. 83 H. 78
(App.), 924 P.2d 572 (1996).

Photos of different wounds on victim's body caused by
shooting or beating by defendant and accomplice not cumulative and properly
admitted; photos' probative value not substantially outweighed by danger of
unfair prejudice. 84 H. 112 (App.), 929 P.2d 1362 (1996).

Where seller's settlement offer did not contain any
disclaimer of liability or releases from further claims against seller or
broker, jury could have interpreted offer, despite cautionary instruction, as
an admission of liability by seller; offer thus properly excluded. 84 H. 162
(App.), 931 P.2d 604 (1997).

Where expert's testimony on the battered child syndrome was
relevant to prove that the injuries to child were not accidental and that
someone must have intended to harm child, trial court did not abuse discretion
in admitting testimony. 101 H. 256 (App.), 66 P.3d 785 (2003).

Where ongoing department of health violations had probative
value as to defendant care home operator's reckless state of mind, which
outweighed any danger of unfair prejudice to defendant, trial court did not
abuse discretion in admitting testimony of health inspector regarding the three
violations found during the inspector's inspection of defendant's care home.
104 H. 387 (App.), 90 P.3d 1256 (2004).

Where relevant evidence of witness' potential bias was
elicited at trial, trial court properly balanced the prejudice concerns of
defendant with the relevance and probative value of liability insurance
evidence to reveal witness' potential bias; thus, trial court did not abuse its
discretion in limiting evidence of bias, interest or motive with due regard for
this rule. 106 H. 298 (App.), 104 P.3d 336 (2004).

Where 911 recording contained victim's real-time description
of victim's van being chased and repeatedly rammed by defendant, victim's
expression of fear, and the actual sounds, atmosphere of the alleged assault,
and the angry and threatening voices directed at victim, recording was
extremely probative and not unfairly prejudicial; thus, recording was not
subject to exclusion under this rule. 106 H. 517 (App.), 107 P.3d 1190 (2005).

Where defendant inflicted the injuries that evoked the
abattoir and did not cite any evidence of the effect of the drugs on the victim
other than defendant's proffered cross-examination of the medical examiner,
trial court did not abuse its discretion in deciding that the vaporous
probative value of the evidence was "substantially outweighed by the
danger of unfair prejudice, confusion of the issues, or misleading the jury",
not to mention "considerations of undue delay or waste of time". 107
H. 452 (App.), 114 P.3d 958 (2005).

Where State introduced into evidence prior instances of
violence between defendant and girlfriend to help explain why girlfriend recanted
at trial girlfriend's statement to police, evidence of prior violence between
defendant and girlfriend was needed because it provided context for their
relationship whereas no other evidence in the trial did, and family court
alleviated the risk of prejudice by specifically instructing jury not to
consider the prior instances of violence in determining defendant's guilt or
innocence, family court did not err in finding that probative value of evidence
outweighed its prejudicial effect. 110 H. 154 (App.), 129 P.3d 1182 (2006).

Where the significant danger of jury confusion that would
result from defendant calling nephew as a witness for the limited purpose of
establishing their relationship substantially outweighed the probative value of
such evidence, trial court did not abuse its discretion in precluding nephew
from testifying. 110 H. 386 (App.), 133 P.3d 815 (2006).

Trial court erred harmfully in excluding, pursuant to rule
401 and this rule, defendant's exhibit with respect to defendant's theft-by-deception
charges under §708-830(2), on the grounds that defendant's analysis of the tax
laws was irrelevant and that evidence of defendant's legal theories would
confuse the jury, where evidence that defendant, based on defendant's
understanding of the tax laws, had a good faith belief that defendant did not
owe taxes on defendant's wages was relevant to whether defendant acted by
deception and whether defendant had a defense under §708-834(1). 119 H. 60
(App.), 193 P.3d 1260 (2008).

Where, pursuant to §231-40, the Cheek interpretation of the
wilfulness requirement--that a jury must be permitted to consider evidence of a
defendant's good faith belief that defendant's conduct did not violate the tax
laws, even if that belief was not objectively reasonable, in determining
whether defendant acted wilfully--was adopted and applied in construing
§231-36(a), the trial court erred in excluding defendant's exhibit pursuant to
rule 401 and this rule on the grounds that defendant's analysis of the tax laws
was irrelevant and that evidence of defendant's legal theories would confuse
the jury. 119 H. 60 (App.), 193 P.3d 1260 (2008).

Trial court did not abuse its discretion in finding that the
probative value of the one-half and one-third of real time speed versions of
the slow-motion FBI enhanced videotape was not substantially outweighed by any
potential prejudice where the versions were highly probative of the sequence of
events when defendant was approached by the two officers and were not
cumulative because each provided a somewhat different perspective; they were
not unduly prejudicial because there was sufficient foundation established as
to their preparation, they contained a time counter indicating the speed at
which it was playing, and the jury could compare them to the original. 120 H.
499 (App.), 210 P.3d 22 (2009).

Trial court did not err in admitting seatbelt buckle patent
into evidence under rules 401, 402 and this rule for the limited purpose of
showing a defect in the seatbelt where the language in the patent that "known
mechanisms are complicated, and some do not positively retain the latch plate"
may have evinced a defect in the seatbelt that could have resulted in inertial
or inadvertent release in the case, as well as defendant's knowledge of such a
defect. 121 H. 143 (App.), 214 P.3d 1133 (2009).

When determining whether proffered evidence is cumulative, a
trial court must weigh how much time it would take to present such evidence
relative to the evidence's probative value; where seatbelt expert's testimony
clearly differed from other expert's testimony, and there was no evidence that
trial court attempted to ascertain how long it would take expert to testify,
consider limiting the expert's testimony time, or balance whether the probative
force of the testimony would be outweighed by its contribution to the length of
trial, trial court erred in excluding expert's testimony on cumulative evidence
grounds. 121 H. 143 (App.), 214 P.3d 1133 (2009).

Primarily for reasons with regard to the time that had
elapsed between the other bad acts and the charged crime and applying the test
set out in this rule, the circuit court did not abuse its discretion in
allowing the State to adduce at trial evidence of defendant's prior convictions
under rule 404(b). 123 H. 456 (App.), 235 P.3d 1168 (2010).

As the right of confrontation is not absolute, circuit court
properly ruled that defendant was not entitled to introduce selected portions
of witness' statement that were favorable to defendant's defense and at the
same time preclude the State from introducing other portions of witness'
statement that were necessary to prevent the jury from being misled; thus,
circuit court did not abuse its discretion in ruling that the responsive
portions of witness' statement offered by the State were admissible under rule
106 and this rule. 125 H. 462 (App.), 264 P.3d 40 (2011).

There was no plain error in the admission of officer's
statements regarding defendant's telephone conversation with wife while in
custody to "clean the car", where statements had at least some
bearing on defendant's consciousness of guilt and defendant's attempts to
conceal evidence linking defendant to decedent's death, both facts at issue in
the case, and there was no danger of confusing the jury as counsel for both
sides noted in front of the jury that officer's testimony concerned events in
2007. 126 H. 40 (App.), 266 P.3d 448 (2011).

Where defendant presented no evidence linking any third
person to decedent's death and failed to show how evidence of decedent's prior
sexual behavior could sufficiently link identifiable third persons to
decedent's death, defendant did not demonstrate that decedent's prior sexual
behavior was relevant by establishing that it had a "tendency to make the
existence of any fact that is of consequence" to defendant's defense that
someone else killed the decedent "more probable or less probable";
circuit court thus properly excluded evidence of decedent's prior sexual
behavior. 126 H. 40 (App.), 266 P.3d 448 (2011).

Circuit court did not abuse its discretion in admitting video
showing defendant masturbating for "child" where video: (1) was
extremely probative of defendant’s intent to promote or facilitate the
commission of one of the predicate felonies necessary to prove first degree
electronic enticement of a child under §707-756; (2) provided clear evidence of
defendant’s motives and desires regarding the "child" and the extreme
actions defendant was willing to undertake in order to entice the "child";
and (3) was the strongest evidence of defendant’s intention to engage in sexual
activity with the "child". 128 H. 328 (App.), 289 P.3d 964 (2012).

Mentioned: 129 H. 250 (App.), 297 P.3d 1106 (2013).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next